Hawaii statutes.
§605-6 Rules. The supreme court may
prescribe qualifications for admission to practice and rules for the government
of practitioners. [CC 1859, §1072; RL 1925, §2309; RL 1935, §3608; RL 1945,
§9706; RL 1955, §217-6; HRS §605-6; am L 1972, c 184, §1(c)]

Rules of Court

See RSC rules 1, 2; Code of Professional Responsibility.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next